Utah statutes.
75-7-905.   Reviewing compliance.

Compliance with the prudent investor rule is determined in light of the facts and circumstances existing at the time of a trustee's decision or action and not by hindsight.  This section does not require a specific outcome in investing.



Enacted by Chapter 89, 2004 General Session

